Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202528-711
Child subjected to abuse or neglect; report; contents; toll-free number.

(1) When any physician, any medical institution, any nurse, any school employee, any social worker, the Inspector General appointed under section 50-1805, or any other person has reasonable cause to believe that a child has been subjected to child abuse or neglect or observes such child being subjected to conditions or circumstances which reasonably would result in child abuse or neglect, he or she shall report such incident or cause a report of child abuse or neglect to be made to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department on the toll-free number established by subsection (2) of this section. Such report may be made orally by telephone with the caller giving his or her name and address, shall be followed by a written report, and to the extent available shall contain the address and age of the abused or neglected child, the address of the person or persons having custody of the abused or neglected child, the nature and extent of the child abuse or neglect or the conditions and circumstances which would reasonably result in such child abuse or neglect, any evidence of previous child abuse or neglect including the nature and extent, and any other information which in the opinion of the person may be helpful in establishing the cause of such child abuse or neglect and the identity of the perpetrator or perpetrators. Law enforcement agencies receiving any reports of child abuse or neglect under this subsection shall notify the department pursuant to section 28-718 on the next working day by telephone or mail.

(2) The department shall establish a statewide toll-free number to be used by any person any hour of the day or night, any day of the week, to make reports of child abuse or neglect. Reports of child abuse or neglect not previously made to or by a law enforcement agency shall be made immediately to such agency by the department.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 150;

Laws 1979, LB 505, § 2;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 43;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 432;

Laws 2005, LB 116, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB821, § 39;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 66.